Idaho statutes. Title 22 AGRICULTURE AND HORTICULTURE
Chapter 52
CARBON SEQUESTRATION ADVISORY COMMITTEE

Sec.

§ 22-5201. Legislative intent. [Repealed.]

Repealed by S.L. 2020, ch. 74, § 1, effective July 1, 2020.

History.

I.C.,§ 22-5101, as added by 2002, ch. 365, § 1, p. 1029; am. and redesig. 2003, ch. 16, § 3, p. 48; am. 2010, ch. 279, § 19, p. 719.

§ 22-5202. Carbon sequestration advisory committee created — Membership — Compensation

Administrative assistance. [Repealed.]

Repealed by S.L. 2020, ch. 74, § 1, effective July 1, 2020.

History.

I.C.,§ 22-5102, as added by 2002, ch. 365, § 1, p. 1029.; am. and redesig. 2003, ch. 16, § 4, p. 48; am. 2006, ch. 217, § 1, p. 652; am. 2010, ch. 279, § 20, p. 719.

§ 22-5203. Powers and duties of the carbon sequestration advisory committee. [Repealed.]

Repealed by S.L. 2020, ch. 74, § 1, effective July 1, 2020.

History.

I.C.,§ 22-5103, as added by 2002, ch. 365, § 1, p. 1029; am. and redesig. 2003, ch. 16, § 5, p. 48; am. 2010, ch. 279, § 21, p. 719.

§ 22-5204. Reports

Contents. [Repealed.]

Repealed by S.L. 2011, ch. 151, § 11, effective July 1, 2011.

History.

I.C.,§ 22-5104, as added by 2002, ch. 365, § 1, p. 1029; am. and redesig. 2003, ch. 16, § 6, p. 48.

§ 22-5205. Powers and duties of the chairman. [Repealed.]

Repealed by S.L. 2020, ch. 74, § 1, effective July 1, 2020.

History.

I.C.,§ 22-5105, as added by 2002, ch. 365, § 1, p. 1029; am. and redesig. 2003, ch. 16, § 7, p. 48; am. 2010, ch. 279, § 22, p. 719.

§ 22-5206. Carbon sequestration assessment fund created. [Repealed.]

Repealed by S.L. 2020, ch. 74, § 1, effective July 1, 2020.

History.

I.C.,§ 22-5106, as added by 2002, ch. 365, § 1, p. 1029; am. and redesig. 2003, ch. 16, § 8, p. 48; am. 2010, ch. 279, § 23, p. 719.